Alaska statutes. Title 3. Agriculture, Animals, and Food.
Chapter 90. General Provisions.

Sec. 03.90.010.
Definitions.

In this title, unless otherwise indicated,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“department” means the Department of Natural Resources.

History.

(am E.O. No. 51, § 17 (1981))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

03.60.010

. Renumbered in 2008. This section was reorganized in 1983 to alphabetize the defined terms.